South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3105.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 5, Chapter 3, Title 20 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 20-3-625.  A finding by the court that nonmarital property has transmuted into marital property for purposes of the court apportioning the marital property pursuant to Section 20-3-620 requires clear and convincing evidence that the owner of the nonmarital property intended that the property become marital property. Payment of a debt for nonmarital property is evidence of special equity and not evidence of transmutation unless the title for the property is in the names of both parties. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----